Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.01
Administrator of divisions; compensation.

The compensation of the administrators of the division of communications and the information management services division shall be fixed by the Chief Information Officer subject to availability of appropriations. The compensation of all other administrators shall be fixed by the director subject to availability of appropriations.

Laws 1969, c. 804, § 3, p. 3033;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 2.